District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.82

Prior legislation.

This subchapter shall not adversely affect any actions taken, agreements entered into, pledge of security made or Bonds issued prior to September 8, 2004.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-185, § 13, 51 DCR 5941